Alabama, session 2026rs, HB405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-10-40.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§13A-10-40.1
(a) A person commits the crime of bail jumping in the
third degree if, having been lawfully released from custody,
with or without bail, upon condition that he or she is subject
to electronic monitoring, he or she violates any condition of
his or her court ordered electronic monitoring.
(b) It is a defense to prosecution under this section
that the defendant's violation was unintentional or was
unavoidable and due to circumstances beyond his or her
control. The burden of injecting the defense of an
unintentional violation, or unavoidability and circumstances
beyond his or control, is on the defendant.
(c) Bail jumping in the third degree is a Class C
misdemeanor.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB405 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 2